Louisiana, session 2026, HB858.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 44:4(65) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §4. Applicability
8 This Chapter shall not apply:
9 * * *
10 (65) To any global positioning data on wildlife or aquatic life collected by
11 or in the possession of the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries that would reveal
12 the location of individual animals.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.